Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 3
DAMAGE BY WILDLIFE

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 3 of chapter 62, C.R.S. 1963. The substantive provisions of this article were repealed and reenacted in 1969, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1969, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 FORAGE LOSSES